Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2237.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9(a) introductory paragraph of the act of June 23, 1999 (P.L.159, No.22), known as the New Economy Technology Scholarship Act, is amended to read:Section 9. Annual report.(a) Development of report.--The agency shall publish a report [by September 1, 2000, and every year thereafter.] no later than September 1 following the end of the fiscal year in which funds were allocated for the purpose of the program. The report shall include information regarding the operation of the program, to include:* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.123456789101112131415161718